Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 41A.09, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the terms defined in this subdivision have the meanings given them. (a) "Ethanol" means fermentation ethyl alcohol derived from agricultural products, including potatoes, cereal grains, cheese whey, and sugar beets; forest products; or other renewable resources, including residue and waste generated from the production, processing, and marketing of agricultural products, forest products, and other renewable resources, that: (1) meets all of the specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D4806-21adeleted text end new text begin D4806new text end ; and (2) is denatured as specified in Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, parts 20 and 21. (b) "Ethanol plant" means a plant at which ethanol is produced. (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture. (d) "Rural economic infrastructure" means the development of activities that will enhance the value of agricultural crop or livestock commodities or by-products or waste from farming operations through new and improved value-added conversion processes and technologies, the development of more timely and efficient infrastructure delivery systems, and the enhancement of marketing opportunities. "Rural economic infrastructure" also means land, buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements located or to be located in Minnesota and used or operated primarily for the processing or the support of production of marketable products from agricultural commodities or wind energy produced in Minnesota. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 46.044, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance and conditions. An application for a bank charter must be granted if (1) the applicants are of good moral character and financial integrity, (2) there is a reasonable public demand for this bank in this location, (3) the probable volume of business in this location is sufficient to deleted text begin insuredeleted text end new text begin ensurenew text end and maintain the solvency of the new bank and the solvency of the then existing bank or banks in the locality without endangering the safety of any bank in the locality as a place of deposit of public and private money, (4) the commissioner of commerce is satisfied that the proposed bank will be properly and safely managed, and (5) the commissioner is satisfied that the capital funds required pursuant to section 48.02 are available and the commissioner may accept any reasonable demonstration including subscription agreements supported by current financial statements. If the application does not satisfy the requirements of this subdivision, it must be denied. In case of the denial of the application, the commissioner of commerce shall specify the grounds for the denial. A person aggrieved may obtain judicial review of the determination in accordance with chapter 14. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 48.195, is amended to read: 48.195 INTEREST RATES; USURY LIMIT FOR DEPOSITORY INSTITUTIONS. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a bank, savings bank, savings association, or credit union organized under the laws of this state, or a national bank or federally chartered savings bank, savings association, or credit union, doing business in this state, may charge on any loan or discount made or upon any note, bill or other evidence of debt, except an extension of credit made pursuant to section 48.185, interest at a rate of not more than 4-1/2 percent in excess of the discount rate, including any surcharge thereon, on 90-day commercial paper in effect at thenew text begin Board of Governors of thenew text end Federal Reserve deleted text begin Bank located in the Ninth Federal Reserve Districtdeleted text end new text begin Systemnew text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 49.37, is amended to read: 49.37 STOCKHOLDERS TO APPROVE; CERTIFICATE OF CONSOLIDATION OR MERGER. new text begin (a) new text end Either before or after the consolidation or merger agreement has been approved by the commissioner of commerce, it must be submitted to the stockholders of each corporation at a meeting thereof called, and it does not become binding upon the corporation until it has been approved at each of the meetings required by this section by the vote or ballot of the stockholders, holding at least a majority of the amount of stock of the respective corporations, or a higher percentage as may be required by the certificate of incorporation of the corporations. Proof of the holding of these meetings and the results thereof must be submitted to the commissioner of commerce. new text begin (b) new text end After the agreement called for by sections 49.33 to 49.41 has been approved by the stockholders of the respective corporations and by the commissioner of commerce, the deleted text begin latter shalldeleted text end new text begin commissioner of commerce mustnew text end issue a certificate reciting that the corporations have complied with the provisions of sections 49.34 to 49.41 and declaring the consolidation or merger of these corporations and the name of the consolidated or surviving corporation, the amount of capital stock thereof, the names of the first board of directors, and the place of business of the consolidated or surviving corporation, which must be within the city where any of the constituent corporations have been previously authorized to have their places of business. new text begin (c) new text end Upon the issuing of this certificate deleted text begin and the filing of it for record in the Office of the Secretary of State,deleted text end the incorporation is deemed to be complete in the case of the consolidation, and the assets of the constituent corporations merged into the survivor in the case of a merger, and the consolidated or surviving corporation shall, from the date of this certificate, have the term of corporate existence as may be specified in it, not exceeding the longest unexpired term of any constituent corporation. The certificate of the commissioner of commerce is prima facie evidence that all of the provisions of sections 49.34 to 49.41 have been complied with, and is conclusive evidence of the existence of the consolidated or surviving corporation. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 58B.051, is amended to read: 58B.051 REGISTRATION FOR LENDERS. (a) Beginning January 1, 2025, a lender must register with the commissioner as a lender before providing services in Minnesota. A lender must not offer or make a student loan to a resident of Minnesota without first registering with the commissioner as provided in this section. (b) A registration application must include: (1) the lender's name; (2) the lender's address; (3) the names of all officers, directors, owners, or other persons in control of an applicant, as defined in section 58B.02, subdivision 6; and (4) any other information the commissioner requires deleted text begin by ruledeleted text end . (c) Registration issued or renewed expires December 31 of each year. A lender must renew the lender's registration on an annual basis. (d) The commissioner may adopt and enforce: (1) registration procedures for lenders, which may include using the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry; (2) nonrefundable registration fees for lenders, which may include fees for using the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, to be paid directly by the lender; (3) procedures and nonrefundable fees to renew a lender's registration, which may include fees for the renewed use of Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, to be paid directly by the lender; and (4) alternate registration procedures and nonrefundable fees for postsecondary education institutions that offer student loans. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Annual statements required. Every insurance company, including fraternal benefit societies, and reciprocal exchanges, doing business in this state, shall file with the commissionerdeleted text begin , annually, on or before March 1,deleted text end the appropriate verified National Association of Insurance Commissioners' annual statement blankdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin on or before April 30 for all lines of insurance except health, which must be filed on or before May 31. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners' annual statement blank must benew text end prepared in accordance with the association's instructions handbook and following those accounting procedures and practices prescribed by the association's accounting practices and procedures manual, unless the commissioner requires or finds another method of valuation reasonable under the circumstances. Another method of valuation permitted by the commissioner must be at least as conservative as those prescribed in the association's manual. All companies required to file an annual statement under this subdivision may also be required to file with the commissioner and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners a copy of their annual statement in an electronic form prescribed by the commissioner. All Minnesota domestic insurers required to file annual statements under this subdivision must also file quarterly statements with the commissioner for the first, second, and third calendar quarter on or before 45 days after the end of the applicable quarter, prepared in accordance with the association's instruction handbook. All companies required to file quarterly statements under this subdivision may also be required to file the quarterly statements with the commissioner and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners in an electronic form prescribed by the commissioner. In addition, the commissioner may require the filing of any other information determined to be reasonably necessary for the continual enforcement of these laws. The statement may be limited to the insurer's business and condition in the United States unless the commissioner finds that the business conducted outside the United States may detrimentally affect the interests of policyholders in this state. The statements shall also contain a verified schedule showing all details required by law for assessment and taxation. The statement or schedules shall be in the form and shall contain all matters the commissioner may prescribe, and it may be varied as to different types of insurers so as to elicit a true exhibit of the condition of each insurer. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 60A.13, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Company or agent cannot continue business unless statement is filed. deleted text begin Nodeleted text end new text begin Anew text end company deleted text begin shall transactdeleted text end new text begin is prohibited from transactingnew text end any new business in this state after deleted text begin Maydeleted text end new text begin Augustnew text end 31 in any year unless deleted text begin it shall havedeleted text end new text begin the companynew text end previously transmitted its annual statement to the commissioner and filed a copy of its statement with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The commissioner may by order annually require that each insurer pay the required fee to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners for the filing of annual statements, but the fee shall not be more than 50 percent greater than the fee set by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Failure to file the annual statement with the commissioner or the National Association of Insurance Commissioners is a violation of section 72A.061, subdivision 1. The fee shall be based on the relative premium volume of each insurer. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 72A.061, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Extensions. The commissioner may grant an extension of any filing deadline or requirement specified by this sectiondeleted text begin , on receiving, not less than ten daysdeleted text end new text begin if the commissioner receives a written request for an extension from the companynew text end before the date of defaultdeleted text begin , satisfactory evidence of imminent hardship to the companydeleted text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 239.761, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Gasoline. (a) Gasoline that is not blended with biofuel must not be contaminated with water or other impurities and must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end . Gasoline that is not blended with biofuel must also comply with the volatility requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, part 1090. (b) After gasoline is sold, transferred, or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal, a person responsible for the product: (1) may blend the gasoline with agriculturally derived ethanol as provided in subdivision 4; (2) shall not blend the gasoline with any oxygenate other than biofuel; (3) shall not blend the gasoline with other petroleum products that are not gasoline or biofuel; (4) shall not blend the gasoline with products commonly and commercially known as casinghead gasoline, absorption gasoline, condensation gasoline, drip gasoline, or natural gasoline; and (5) may blend the gasoline with a detergent additive, an antiknock additive, or an additive designed to replace tetra-ethyl lead, that is registered by the EPA. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 239.761, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Gasoline blended with ethanol; general. (a) Gasoline may be blended with agriculturally derived, denatured ethanol that complies with the requirements of subdivision 5. (b) A gasoline-ethanol blend must: (1) comply with the volatility requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, part 1090; (2) comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end , or the gasoline base stock from which a gasoline-ethanol blend was produced must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end ; and (3) not be blended with casinghead gasoline, absorption gasoline, condensation gasoline, drip gasoline, or natural gasoline after the gasoline-ethanol blend has been sold, transferred, or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 239.761, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Denatured ethanol. Denatured ethanol that is to be blended with gasoline must be agriculturally derived and must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4806-21adeleted text end new text begin D4806new text end . This includes the requirement that ethanol may be denatured only as specified in Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, parts 20 and 21. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 239.761, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Gasoline blended with nonethanol oxygenate. (a) A person responsible for the product shall comply with the following requirements: (1) after July 1, 2000, gasoline containing in excess of one-third of one percent, in total, of nonethanol oxygenates listed in paragraph (b) must not be sold or offered for sale at any time in this state; and (2) after July 1, 2005, gasoline containing any of the nonethanol oxygenates listed in paragraph (b) must not be sold or offered for sale in this state. (b) The oxygenates prohibited under paragraph (a) are: (1) methyl tertiary butyl ether, as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 34; (2) ethyl tertiary butyl ether, as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 18; or (3) tertiary amyl methyl ether. (c) Gasoline that is blended with a nonethanol oxygenate must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end . Nonethanol oxygenates must not be blended into gasoline after the gasoline has been sold, transferred, or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Heating fuel oil. Heating fuel oil must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D396-12deleted text end new text begin D396new text end . Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Diesel fuel oil. (a) When diesel fuel oil is not blended with biodiesel, it must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D975-12adeleted text end new text begin D975new text end . (b) When diesel fuel oil is a blend of up to five volume percent biodiesel, the diesel component must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D975-12adeleted text end new text begin D975new text end and the biodiesel component must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D6751-11bdeleted text end new text begin D6751new text end . Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Kerosene. Kerosene must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D3699-08deleted text end new text begin D3699new text end . Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Aviation gasoline. Aviation gasoline must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D910-11deleted text end new text begin D910new text end . Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Aviation turbine fuel, jet fuel. Aviation turbine fuel and jet fuel must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D1655-12deleted text end new text begin D1655new text end . Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Gas turbine fuel oil. Fuel oil for use in nonaviation gas turbine engines must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D2880-03deleted text end new text begin D2880new text end . Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. E85. A blend of ethanol and gasoline, containing not more than 85 percent ethanol, produced for use as a motor fuel in alternative fuel vehicles as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 5, must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D5798-11deleted text end new text begin D5798new text end . Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. M85. A blend of methanol and gasoline, containing at least 70 percent methanol and not more than 85 percent methanol, produced for use as a motor fuel in alternative fuel vehicles as defined in section 296A.01, subdivision 5, must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D5797-07deleted text end new text begin D5797new text end . Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Biodiesel fuel definition. "Biodiesel fuel" means a renewable, biodegradable, mono alkyl ester combustible liquid that is derived from agricultural plant oils or animal fats and that meets American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) specification deleted text begin D6751-11bdeleted text end new text begin D6751new text end for Biodiesel Fuel (B100) Blend Stock for Distillate Fuels. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.761, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Grade 82 unleaded aviation gasoline. Grade 82 unleaded aviation gasoline must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D6227-12deleted text end new text begin D6227new text end . Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.77, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Biodiesel blend and fuel. (a) "Biodiesel blend" is a blend of diesel fuel and biodiesel fuel between six percent and 20 percent for on-road and off-road diesel-fueled vehicle use. Biodiesel blend must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D7467-10deleted text end new text begin D7467new text end . (b) "Biodiesel fuel" means a renewable, biodegradable, mono alkyl ester combustible liquid fuel that is derived from agricultural and other plant oils or animal fats and that meets American Society for Testing and Materials specification deleted text begin D6751-11bdeleted text end new text begin D6751new text end for Biodiesel Fuel (B100) Blend Stock for Distillate Fuels. (c) Biodiesel produced from palm oil is not biodiesel fuel for the purposes of this section, unless the palm oil is contained within waste oil and grease collected within the United States or Canada. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Aviation gasoline. "Aviation gasoline" means any gasoline that is used to produce or generate power for propelling internal combustion engine aircraft. Aviation gasoline includes any gasoline: (1) is invoiced and billed by a producer, manufacturer, refiner, or blender to a distributor or dealer, by a distributor to a dealer or consumer, or by a dealer to consumer, as "aviation gasoline" that meets specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D910-16deleted text end new text begin D910new text end or any other ASTM specification as gasoline appropriate for use in producing or generating power for propelling internal combustion engine aircraft; or (2) sold to a dealer of aviation gasoline for dispensing directly into the fuel tank of an aircraft. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Aviation turbine fuel and jet fuel. "Aviation turbine fuel" and "jet fuel" mean blends of hydrocarbons derived from crude petroleum, natural gasoline, and synthetic hydrocarbons, intended for use in aviation turbine engines, and that meet the specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D1655-12deleted text end new text begin D1655new text end . Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Diesel fuel oil. "Diesel fuel oil" means a petroleum distillate or blend of petroleum distillate and residual fuels that is intended for use as a motor fuel in internal combustion diesel engines and that meets ASTM specification deleted text begin D975-11bdeleted text end new text begin D975new text end . Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. E85. "E85" means a petroleum product that is a blend of agriculturally derived denatured ethanol and gasoline or natural gasoline that contains not more than 85 percent ethanol by volume, but at a minimum must contain greater than 50 percent ethanol by volume. For the purposes of this chapter, the energy content of E85 will be considered to be 82,000 BTUs per gallon. E85 produced for use as a motor fuel in alternative fuel vehicles as defined in subdivision 5 must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D5798-11deleted text end new text begin D5798new text end . Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 296A.01, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Ethanol, denatured. "Ethanol, denatured" means ethanol that is to be blended with gasoline, has been agriculturally derived, and complies with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4806-21adeleted text end new text begin D4806new text end . This includes the requirement that ethanol may be denatured only as specified in Code of Federal Regulations, title 27, parts 20 and 21. Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 22, is amended to read: Subd. 22. Gas turbine fuel oil. "Gas turbine fuel oil" means fuel that contains mixtures of hydrocarbon oils free of inorganic acid and excessive amounts of solid or fibrous foreign matter, intended for use in nonaviation gas turbine engines, and that meets the specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D2880-03deleted text end new text begin D2880new text end . Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 296A.01, subdivision 23, is amended to read: Subd. 23. Gasoline. (a) "Gasoline" means: (1) all products commonly or commercially known or sold as gasoline regardless of their classification or uses, except casinghead gasoline, absorption gasoline, condensation gasoline, drip gasoline, or natural gasoline that under the requirements of section 239.761, subdivision 3, must not be blended with gasoline that has been sold, transferred, or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal; and (2) any liquid prepared, advertised, offered for sale or sold for use as, or commonly and commercially used as, a fuel in spark-ignition, internal combustion engines, and that when tested by the Weights and Measures Division meets the specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end . (b) Gasoline that is not blended with ethanol must not be contaminated with water or other impurities and must comply with both ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end and the volatility requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, part 1090. (c) After gasoline is sold, transferred, or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal, a person responsible for the product: (1) may blend the gasoline with agriculturally derived ethanol, as provided in subdivision 24; (2) must not blend the gasoline with any oxygenate other than denatured, agriculturally derived ethanol; (3) must not blend the gasoline with other petroleum products that are not gasoline or denatured, agriculturally derived ethanol; (4) must not blend the gasoline with products commonly and commercially known as casinghead gasoline, absorption gasoline, condensation gasoline, drip gasoline, or natural gasoline; and (5) may blend the gasoline with a detergent additive, an antiknock additive, or an additive designed to replace tetra-ethyl lead, that is registered by the EPA. Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 296A.01, subdivision 24, is amended to read: Subd. 24. Gasoline blended with nonethanol oxygenate. "Gasoline blended with nonethanol oxygenate" means gasoline blended with ETBE, MTBE, or other alcohol or ether, except denatured ethanol, that is approved as an oxygenate by the EPA, and that complies with ASTM specification deleted text begin D4814-24adeleted text end new text begin D4814new text end . Oxygenates, other than denatured ethanol, must not be blended into gasoline after the gasoline has been sold, transferred, or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 26, is amended to read: Subd. 26. Heating fuel oil. "Heating fuel oil" means a petroleum distillate, blend of petroleum distillates and residuals, or petroleum residual heating fuel that meets the specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D396-12deleted text end new text begin D396new text end . Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 28, is amended to read: Subd. 28. Kerosene. "Kerosene" means a refined petroleum distillate consisting of a homogeneous mixture of hydrocarbons essentially free of water, inorganic acidic and basic compounds, and excessive amounts of particulate contaminants and that meets the specifications in ASTM specification deleted text begin D3699-08deleted text end new text begin D3699new text end . Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 296A.01, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. M85. "M85" means a petroleum product that is a liquid fuel blend of methanol and gasoline that contains at least 70 percent methanol and not more than 85 percent methanol by volume. For the purposes of this chapter, the energy content of M85 will be considered to be 65,000 BTUs per gallon. M85 produced for use as a motor fuel in alternative fuel vehicles, as defined in subdivision 5, must comply with ASTM specification deleted text begin D5797-07deleted text end new text begin D5797new text end .